Missouri, session 2026, HB1786.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 43.265, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 43.265, to read as follows:
43.265. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Highway Patrol's Motor
Vehicle, Aircraft, and Watercraft Revolving Fund", which shall be administered by the
superintendent of the highway patrol. All funds received by the highway patrol from:
(1) Any source for purchase and maintenance of highway patrol motor vehicles,
watercraft, watercraft motors, and trailers;
(2) Any source for reimbursement of costs associated with the official use of highway
patrol vehicles;
(3) Any source for restitution for damage to or loss of a highway patrol vehicle or
aircraft;
(4) Any other source for the purchase and maintenance of highway patrol aircraft or
aircraft parts; and
(5) Government agencies for the reimbursement of costs associated with aircraft
flights flown on their behalf by the highway patrol;

shall be credited to the fund. The state treasurer is the custodian of the fund and shall approve
disbursements from the fund subject to appropriation and as provided by law and the
constitution of this state at the request of the superintendent of the highway patrol. The
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1786 2
balances from this fund shall be used for the purchase and maintenance of highway patrol
motor vehicles, highway patrol watercraft, watercraft motors, and trailers, highway patrol
aircraft or aircraft parts and operational costs. Prior to obligating any funds for the purchase
of an individual unit that costs in excess of [one] five hundred thousand dollars, the highway
patrol shall receive a specific appropriation from the general assembly for the particular
purchase. Any unexpended balance in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall be exempt
from the provisions of section 33.080 relating to the transfer of unexpended balances to the
general revenue fund.
✔